en: Cooked young goat
fr: Chevreau cuit
hr: kuhano mlado jareće
it: capretto cotto

en: pork, swine
bg: свинско
ca: Porc
cs: Vepřové, vepřová, vepřový
da: Svin
de: Schwein
es: cerdo, cea
fi: sika, siasta, sian
fr: porc
he: חזיר
hr: svinjetina
hu: sertés, disznó, malac
it: suino
ja: 豚, ポーク
lt: kiauliena
lv: cūkgaļa
nb: svin, flesk
nl: varken
pl: Wieprzowina, wieprzowy, wieprzowe, wieprzowa
pt: Porco
ro: porc
ru: Свинина
sv: gris
tr: domuz
zh: 猪

en: pork meat
bg: свинско месо
ca: Carn de porc
cs: Vepřové maso
da: svinekød, grisekød
de: Schweinefleisch, Schweinfleisch
es: carne de cerdo
fi: sianliha, sianlihaa, porsaanliha, porsaanlihaa, viljaporsaanliha
fr: viande de porc, viande porc
hr: svinjsko meso, meso od svinjetine, svinjetina mesa, svinjsko meso I kategorije
hu: sertéshús, disznóhús
it: carne di suino, carne di maiale, carne suina
ja: 豚肉, ぶたにく, 豚にく, ぶた肉
lt: kiaulienos mėsa
nb: svinekjøtt, kjøtt av svin
nl: Varkensvlees
pl: mięso wieprzowe
pt: carne de suíno, carne de porco
ro: carne de porc, carne porc
sk: bravčové mäso
sl: svinjsko meso
sv: fläskkött, griskött, svinkött, fläsk, kött från gris
tr: domuz eti
zh: 猪肉

en: mechanically separated meat of pork
bg: свинско механично отделено месо
de: mechanisch separiertes Schweinefleisch
es: carne de cerdo separada mecánicamente
fr: viande de porc séparée mécaniquement, viande séparée mécaniquement de porc
hr: strojno otkošteno svinjsko meso, mehanički odvojena svinjetina
it: carne di maiale separata meccanicamente
nl: mechanisch gescheiden varkensvlees
pl: mięso oddzielone mechanicznie wieprzowe, wieprzowina oddzialona mechanicznie

en: minced pork
bg: смляна свинска кайма, свинска кайма, мляно свинско месо
ca: carn picada de porc
de: Schweinehackfleisch, Schweinegehacktes
es: carne picada de cerdo
fr: Viande de porc hachée
hr: mljevena svinjetina
it: carne di maiale macinata

en: pork shoulder
bg: свинска плешка, свинско рамо
de: Schweineschulter, Schweinebug
es: paleta de cerdo
fi: porsaan lapa
fr: épaule de porc
hr: svinjska lopatica
it: spalla di maiale
lt: kiaulienos mentė, kiaulienos mentis
pl: mięso wieprzowe z łopatki
sv: grisbog

en: raw pork shoulder
bg: сурова свинска плешка
fr: épaule de porc crue, porc épaule crue
hr: sirova svinjska lopatica
it: spalla di maiale cruda

en: pig cheek
ca: galtes de porc, galtes, galets
de: Schweinebacke, Schweinebacken, Schweinebäckchen
es: carrillada de cerdo, carilleras de cerdo
fr: Joue de cochon
hr: svinjski obraz
it: guanciale di maiale
pl: podgardle wieprzowe

en: dewlap
ca: papada de porc, papada
de: Wamme
es: papada de cerdo, papada
hr: podvornica
it: giogaia

en: lean pork
ca: magre de porc
de: mageres Schweinefleisch
es: magra de cerdo, magro de cerdo, magro
fr: maigre de porc
hr: nemasna svinjetina
it: carne di maiale magra

en: pig snout
es: morro de cerdo, morro
hr: svinjska njuška
it: muso di maiale

en: british pork
de: britisches Schweinefleisch
hr: britanska svinjetina
it: maiale britannico

en: acorn fed iberian pig
es: cerdo de bellota ibéric
hr: iberijska svinja hranjena žirom
it: maiale iberico allevato a ghiande

en: pigs blood
de: Schweineblut
es: sangre de cerdo
hr: svinjska krv
it: sangue di maiale

en: pork rind
af: Couenne
an: Couenne
ar: قشرة لحم الخنزير
be: Скварка
bg: Пръжки
bn: শূকরচর্ম
br: Couenne
ca: llardó
co: coghja
cs: škvarky, vepřové kůže
cy: Couenne
da: flæskesvær
de: Schwarte, Schwarten, Schweineschwarte, Schweineschwarten
eo: fritita porkhaŭtaĵo
es: chicharrón
et: seakamar
eu: gantxigor
fi: kamara
fr: couenne, couennes
ga: Couenne
gd: Couenne
gl: Couenne
gn: chicharõ
hi: पोर्क का छिलका
hr: čvarci
hu: sertésbőrke, sertésbőr, szalonnabőr
ia: Couenne
id: Couenne
ie: Couenne
io: Couenne
is: Couenne
it: cotenne, Ciccioli
ja: ポーク・スクラッチング
kn: Couenne
ko: 돼지 껍데기
la: Tergilla
lb: Couenne
li: Zjwaasj
lt: Spirgai
mg: Couenne
mk: Џимиринки
ms: Couenne
nb: fleskesvor
nl: zwoerd, varkenszwoerd
nn: Couenne
oc: Couenne
or: ପୋର୍କ ଚମଡା
pa: ਪੋਰਕ ਦਾ ਛਿਲਕਾ
pl: skwarki, skórki wieprzowe, skóry wieprzowe
pt: torresmo
rm: Couenne
ro: șorici
ru: шкварки
sc: Couenne
sk: Couenne
sl: ocvirki
sq: lëkurë derri
sr: Чварци
sv: svål
sw: Couenne
th: แคบหมู
tl: Tsitsaron
uk: Шкварки
vi: Tóp mỡ
vo: Couenne
wa: Couenne
wo: Couenne
zh: 豬皮
zu: Couenne

en: bacon
ar: باكون
be: Бекон
bg: Сланина
br: Kig-sall
ca: cansalada, cansalada de porc
cs: slanina
cv: Бекон
cy: Bacwn
da: Bacon
de: Speck, Schweinespeck
el: Μπέικον
eo: lardo
es: panceta, bacon, tocineta, tocino
eu: Hirugihar
fa: بیکن
fi: Pekoni
fr: bacon, lard
ga: Bagún
gl: Touciño
he: קותל חזיר
hr: slanina
ht: La
hu: szalonna, bacon, bacon szalonna
id: Bacon
io: Lardo
is: Beikon
it: pancetta, bacon, speck, pancetta suina, pancetta di suino
ja: ベーコン
kk: Бекон
ko: 베이컨
mk: Сланина
ml: പന്നിയിറച്ചി
mo: Bacon
nb: bacon, spekk
nl: spek, varkensspek
nn: flesk
pa: ਬੇਕਨ
pl: Boczek, boczek wieprzowy
pt: toucinho
ro: bacon
ru: бекон
sh: Slanina
sk: Slanina
sl: Slanina
sr: сланина
sv: Bacon, späck
ta: பன்றி இறைச்சி
th: เบคอน
tl: Bacon
tr: Domuz pastırması
uk: Бекон
ur: بیکن
uz: Bekon
vi: Thịt muối
wa: lård
yi: שפעק
zh: 煙肉

en: pork heart
bg: свинско сърце, свински сърца
ca: cor de porc
de: Schweineherz
es: corazón de cerdo
fr: coeur de porc
hr: svinjsko srce
it: cuore di maiale
pl: serca wieprzowe, serce wieprzowe

en: pork kidney
de: Schweineniere
fr: rogons de porc
hr: svinjski bubreg
it: rene di maiale
nl: varkensnier

en: pork tripe
it: trippa di maiale
pl: żołądki wieprzowe

en: pigs trotters
de: Schweinepfoten
es: patas de cerdo
hr: svinje kasači
it: zampe di maiale